Utah statutes.
63K-1-302.   Place of legislative session.
(1) (a)  If the governor or the governor's interim successor declares a state
of emergency, the governor shall call the Legislature into session as soon as
practicable.
(b)  Each legislator shall proceed to the place of session as expeditiously as
practicable.
(2)  If the governor or the governor's interim successor declares a state of
emergency or finds that a state of emergency is imminent, and the governor or
the interim successor determines that the prescribed place of session is
unsafe, the governor may change the place of session to any place in Utah that
the governor considers safe and convenient.
